Ohio, session 136, SB432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2927.01 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2927.01. (A) No person, except as authorized by law, shall treat a human corpse in a way that the person knows would outrage reasonable family sensibilitiespurposely do the following: (1) Abuse a corpse; (2) Disinter, remove, or carry away a corpse. (B) No person, except as authorized by law, shall treat a human corpse in a way that would outrage reasonable community sensibilitiespurposely do the following: (1) Engage in sexual activity with or involving a corpse; (2) Dismember, mutilate, cut, or strike a corpse. (C) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of abuse of a corpse, a misdemeanor felony of the second fifth degree. Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of gross abuse of a corpse, a felony of the fifth third degree. (D) As used in this section, "abuse a corpse" includes treatment of a corpse by any person in a manner not recognized by generally accepted standards of the community or treatment of a corpse by a professional person in a manner not generally accepted as suitable practice by other members of the profession, as defined by rules applicable to the profession. Section 2. That existing section 2927.01 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.